src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51yksikuudetta

+Pl+Abe:ksittäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksilläkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksillekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksinekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksienkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiinkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdetkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdelläkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdellekuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdenkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteenkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htäkuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksikuudetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yksineljättä

+Pl+Abe:ksittäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksilläneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksilleneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksineneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksienneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiinneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdetneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksineljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdelläneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdelleneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdenneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteenneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ksineljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htäneljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksineljättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yksiseitsemättä

+Pl+Abe:ksittäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksilläseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksilleseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksineseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksienseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiinseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdetseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksiseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdelläseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdelleseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdenseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteenseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htäseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksiseitsemättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yksitoista

+Pl+Abe:ksittätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksillätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksilletoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksinetoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksientoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiintoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdettoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksitoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdellätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdelletoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdentoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteentoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ksitoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htätoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksitoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yksiviidettä

+Pl+Abe:ksittäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksilläviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksilleviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksineviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksienviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiinviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdetviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksiviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdelläviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdelleviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdenviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteenviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htäviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksiviidettä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yksiyhdeksättä

+Pl+Abe:ksittäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:ksiltäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:ksilläyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:ksilleyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ksineyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:ksistäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:ksinäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ksienyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:ksiinyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:ksissäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:hdetyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:ksiäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:ksiksiyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:hdettäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:hdeltäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:hdelläyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:hdelleyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:hdestäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:htenäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:hdenyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:hteenyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:hdessäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:ksiyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:htäyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:hdeksiyhdeksättä  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_KOLMASOSA

:  NOUN_VOIMA  ;

LEXICON NUM_VIITISEN

#:  NUMERAL  ;

:  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;


LEXICON NUM_KUUTISEN

#:  NUMERAL  ;

:  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENTÄ

#:  NUMERAL  ;

+Sg+Nom:  #  ;
+Sg+Nom:  NUM_BACK_CLIT  ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMEN

:  NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENKUNTA

:na  NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

:n  NUM_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

:ta  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
:ta  NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
:ta  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:ta  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:ta  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;

:t  NUM_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
:t  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:t  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:t  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON NUM_PUOLI

:e  NUM_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
:e  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;

:i  NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;

:  NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;
:  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:  NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:  NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
:  NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
biljoonasosa+Num:biljoonasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kahdeksansataa+Num:kahdeksan#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksantoista+Num:kahdeksan#toista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksantoistasataa+Num:kahdeksantoistasataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksantuhatta+Num:kahdeksantuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksasosa+Num:kahdeksasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kahdeksisenkymmentä+Num:kahdeksisen#kymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksisen+Num:kahdeksisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
kahdeksisensataa+Num:kahdeksisensataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdeksisentuhatta+Num:kahdeksisentuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kahdesosa+Num:kahdesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kahta+Num:kahta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kaksikymmentä+Num:kaksikymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kaksisataa+Num:kaksisataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kaksitoista+Num:kaksi#toista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kaksituhatta+Num:kaksi#tuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kaks+Num:kaks  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmasosa+Num:kolmasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kolmekymmentä+Num:kolme#kymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmesataa+Num:kolme#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmetoista+Num:kolme#toista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmetuhatta+Num:kolme#tuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmisenkymmentä+Num:kolmisen#kymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kolmisen+Num:kolmisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
kolmisentuhatta+Num:kolmisentuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kuudesosa+Num:kuudesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kuusisataa+Num:kuusisataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kuutisenkymmentä+Num:kuutisenkymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kuutisen+Num:kuutisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
kymmenentuhatta+Num:kymmenentuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
kymmenesosa+Num:kymmenesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kymmenestuhannesosa+Num:kymmenestuhannesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
kymmenisen+Num:kymmenisen  NUM_VIITISEN  ;
kymmenkunta+Num:kymmen#kunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
kymmenkunta+Num:kymmenkunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
kymmen+Num:kymmen  NUM_KYMMEN  ;
miljardisosa+Num:miljardisos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
miljoonasosa+Num:miljoonasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
nelisen+Num:nelisen  NUM_VIITISEN  ;
nelisensataa+Num:nelisensataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
neljäsataa+Num:neljä#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
neljäsosa+Num:neljäsos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
neljätoista+Num:neljätoista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
parisataa+Num:pari#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
parisen+Num:parisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
parisensataa+Num:parisensataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
puolensataa+Num:puolen#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
puolikymmentä+Num:puolikymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
puoli+Num:puol  NUM_PUOLI  ;
puolisen+Num:puolisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
puolisensataa+Num:puolisen#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
puolisentoistasataa+Num:puolisentoistasataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
puolitoistasataa+Num:puolitoistasataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
sadasosa+Num:sadasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
sadastuhannesosa+Num:sadastuhannesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
satakunta+Num:sata#kunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
satakunta+Num:satakunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
satatuhatta+Num:satatuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
seitsemisen+Num:seitsemisen  NUM_VIITISEN  ;
seitsemisentoista+Num:seitsemisentoista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
seitsemäntoista+Num:seitsemäntoista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
seitsemäsosa+Num:seitsemäsos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
toistakymmentätuhatta+Num:toistakymmentätuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
triljoonasosa+Num:triljoonasos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
tuhannesosa+Num:tuhannesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
tuhantisen+Num:tuhantisen  NUM_KUUTISEN  ;
tuhatkunta+Num:tuhat#kunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
tuhatkunta+Num:tuhatkunt  NUM_KYMMENKUNTA  ;
viidesosa+Num:viidesos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
viisikymmentä+Num:viisi#kymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
viisitoista+Num:viisi#toista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
viitisenkymmentä+Num:viitisen#kymmentä  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
viitisen+Num:viitisen  NUM_VIITISEN  ;
viitisentuhatta+Num:viitisentuhatta  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yhdeksisen+Num:yhdeksisen  NUM_VIITISEN  ;
yhdeksisentoista+Num:yhdeksisentoista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yhdeksänsataa+Num:yhdeksän#sataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yhdeksäntoistasataa+Num:yhdeksäntoistasataa  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yhdeksäsosa+Num:yhdeksäsos  NUM_KOLMASOSA  ;
yhdestoista+Num:yhdes#toista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yksikuudetta+Num:y  NUM_51yksikuudetta  ;
yksineljättä+Num:y  NUM_51yksineljättä  ;
yksiseitsemättä+Num:y  NUM_51yksiseitsemättä  ;
yksisentoista+Num:yksisentoista  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
yksitoista+Num:y  NUM_51yksitoista  ;
yksiviidettä+Num:y  NUM_51yksiviidettä  ;
yksiyhdeksättä+Num:y  NUM_51yksiyhdeksättä  ;
yks+Num:yks  NUM_KYMMENTÄ  ;
